Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2147
Sale; proceeds; surplus; disposition.

If such surplus, or any part thereof, shall remain in the court for the term of three months without being applied for, the court may direct the same to be put out at interest under the direction of the court for the benefit of the defendant, his representative or assigns, to be paid to them by the order of such court.

R.S.1867, Code § 855, p. 543;

R.S.1913, § 8264;

C.S.1922, § 9217;

C.S.1929, § 20-2149;

R.S.1943, § 25-2147.